Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 17-21-101.
Definitions.

In this chapter:

“Business” includes every trade, occupation and profession;

“Chief executive office” means the principal operating headquarters and the primary offices of the chief executive officer;

“Debtor in bankruptcy” means a person who is the subject of:

An order for relief under title 11 of the United States Code or a comparable order under a successor statute of general application; or

A comparable order under federal or state law governing insolvency.

“Distribution” means a transfer of cash or other property from a partnership to a partner in the partner’s capacity as a partner, or to the partner’s transferee;

“Foreign registered limited liability partnership” means a partnership or association formed under, or pursuant to an agreement governed by, the laws of any state or jurisdiction other than this state that is registered as a limited liability partnership under the laws of the other jurisdiction;

“Partnership” means an association of two (2) or more persons to carry on as coowners a business for profit formed under W.S.

17-21-202

, predecessor law, or comparable law of another jurisdiction, and includes for all purposes of the laws of this state, a registered limited liability partnership;

“Partnership agreement” means an agreement, written or oral, among the partners concerning the partnership;

“Partnership at will” means a partnership in which the partners have not agreed to remain partners until the expiration of a definite term or the completion of a particular undertaking;

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision, agency or instrumentality or any other legal or commercial entity;

“Property” means all property, real, personal or mixed, tangible or intangible, or any interest therein;

“Registered limited liability partnership” means a partnership formed pursuant to an agreement governed by the laws of this state, registered under W.S.

17-21-1101

and complying with W.S.

17-21-1103

;

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the commonwealth of Puerto Rico or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States;

“Statement” means a statement of partnership authority under W.S.

17-21-303

, a statement of denial under W.S.

17-21-304

, a statement of dissociation under W.S.

17-21-704

, a statement of dissolution under W.S.

17-21-806

, a statement of merger under W.S.

17-21-906

, a statement of registration as a registered limited liability partnership, or a renewal thereof, under W.S.

17-21-1101

, a statement of continuance under W.S.

17-21-1106

, a statement of registration as a foreign registered limited liability partnership, or a renewal thereof, under W.S.

17-21-1104

or an amendment, cancellation or withdrawal of any of the foregoing;

“Transfer” includes an assignment, conveyance, lease, mortgage, deed and encumbrance;

“Registered agent” means as provided in W.S.

17-28-101

through

17-28-111

.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1; 1998, ch. 85, § 2; 2003, ch. 134, § 2; 2008, ch. 90, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

Laws 2008, ch. 90, § 2, amends this section effective January 1, 2009, by adding “(a)(xv).”

Applicability. —

Limited partners did not owe another limited partner a fiduciary duty because (1) the limited partnership agreement imposed no such duty, (2) the common law imposed no such duty, and (3) Wyoming statutory law imposed no such duty, as provisions of the Wyoming Uniform Partnership Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

17-21-101

et seq., regarding fiduciary duties were not extended to limited partnerships. Wallop Canyon Ranch, LLC v. Goodwyn, 2015 WY 81, 351 P.3d 943,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 2015).

Applied

in

Warnick v. Warnick, 2003 WY 113, 76 P.3d 316,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 2003).

§ 17-21-102.
Knowledge and notice.

A person knows a fact if the person has knowledge of it.

A person has notice of a fact if the person:

Knows of it;

Has received a notice of it; or

Has reason to know it exists from all of the facts known to that person at the time in question.

A person notifies or gives a notice to another by taking steps reasonably required to inform the other person in the ordinary course of business, whether or not the other person learns of it.

A person is notified or receives a notice of a fact when:

The existence of the fact comes to the person’s attention; or

The notice is duly delivered at the person’s place of business or at any other place held out by the person as a place for receiving communications.

Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, notice received by a person who is not an individual, including a partnership, is effective for a particular transaction when the notice is brought to the attention of the individual conducting the transaction, or in any event when the notice would have been brought to that individual’s attention if the person had exercised due diligence. Such a person exercises due diligence if he maintains reasonable routines for communicating significant information to the individual conducting the transaction and there is reasonable compliance with the routines. Due diligence does not require an individual acting for the person to communicate information unless the communication is part of the individual’s regular duties or the individual has reason to know of the transaction and that the transaction would be materially affected by the information.

Receipt of notice by a partner of a matter relating to the partnership is effective immediately as notice to the partnership, but is not effective in the case of fraud on the partnership committed by or with the consent of the partner who received the notice.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

§ 17-21-103.
Effect of partnership agreement; nonwaivable provisions.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a partnership agreement governs relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership. To the extent the partnership agreement does not otherwise provide, this chapter governs relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership.

A partnership agreement may not:

Vary the rights and duties under W.S.

17-21-105

except to eliminate the duty to provide copies of statements to all the partners;

Unreasonably restrict a partner’s right of access to books and records under W.S. 17-21-403(b);

Eliminate the duty of loyalty under W.S. 17-21-404(b);

Unreasonably reduce the duty of care under W.S. 17-21-404(d);

Eliminate the obligation of good faith and fair dealing under W.S. 17-21-404(e);

Vary the power to withdraw as a partner under W.S. 17-21-601(a)(i), except to require the notice to be in writing;

Vary the right to expulsion of a partner by a court in the events specified in W.S. 17-21-601(a)(v);

Vary the requirement to wind up the partnership business in cases specified in W.S. 17-21-801(a)(iv), (v) or (vi); or

Restrict rights of third parties under this chapter.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

Evidence held to show property partnership property. —

See B & R Builders v. Beilgard, 915 P.2d 1195,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 1996).

Applied

in

Warnick v. Warnick, 2003 WY 113, 76 P.3d 316,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 2003).

§ 17-21-104.
Supplemental principles of law.

Unless displaced by particular provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity supplement this chapter.

If an obligation to pay interest arises under this chapter and the rate is not specified, the rate is that specified in W.S.

1-16-102

.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

§ 17-21-105.
Execution, filing, and recording of statements.

A statement may be filed in the office of the secretary of state. A certified copy of a statement that is filed in an office in another state may be filed in the office of the secretary of state. Either filing has the effect provided in this chapter with respect to partnership property located in or transactions that occur in this state. If a statement of partnership authority is filed with the secretary of state under W.S.

17-21-303

, all statements provided for under this chapter subsequent to the filing of this statement shall be filed with the secretary of state in accordance with this chapter. If the secretary of state refuses to file a statement, the secretary of state shall return it to a partner or representative within fifteen (15) days after the document was delivered, together with a brief, written explanation of the reason for the refusal.

A certified copy of a statement that has been filed in the office of the secretary of state that is recorded in the office for recording transfers of real property shall have the effect provided for recorded statements in this chapter. A recorded statement that is not a certified copy of a statement filed in the office of the secretary of state shall not have the effect provided for recorded statements in this chapter.

A statement filed by a partnership must be executed by at least two (2) partners. Other statements must be executed by a partner or other person authorized by this chapter. An individual who executes a statement as, or on behalf of, a partner or other person named as a partner in a statement must personally declare under penalty of perjury that the contents of the statement are accurate.

A person authorized by this chapter to file a statement may amend or cancel the statement by filing an amendment or cancellation that names the partnership, identifies the statement and states the substance of the amendment or cancellation.

A person who files a statement pursuant to this section shall promptly send a copy of the statement to every partner and to any other person named as a partner in the statement. Failure to send a copy of a statement to a partner or other person does not limit the effectiveness of the statement as to a person not a partner.

The secretary of state shall collect a fee of ten dollars ($10.00) for filing or providing a certified copy of a statement. The appropriate county clerk shall collect a fee of ten dollars ($10.00) for recording a statement.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1; 2021 ch. 21, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added the last sentence in (a).

§ 17-21-106.
Law governing internal affairs.

Except as provided in W.S.

17-21-1104

, the laws of the state or other jurisdiction in which a partnership has its chief executive office govern the partnership’s internal affairs.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1; 1998, ch. 85, § 2.

§ 17-21-107.
Partnership subject to amendment or repeal of chapter.

A partnership governed by this chapter is subject to any amendment or repeal of this chapter.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

§ 17-21-108.
Powers.

The secretary of state has the power reasonably necessary to perform the duties required of him by this chapter. The secretary of state shall promulgate reasonable forms, rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

2021 ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 21, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.